Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1822
Student; accredited course on dietetics and nutrition; practice; limitations.

A student enrolled in an accredited course on dietetics and nutrition recognized by the board may perform any action necessary to complete the student's course of study and engage in the practice of medical nutrition therapy under the appropriate supervision of a supervisor in accordance with section 38-1813 or 38-1817 for a period of no more than five years after the student completes the course of study. The board may, in its discretion, grant a limited extension to such five-year period in the event of extraordinary circumstances to allow the student to satisfy the qualifications for licensure under section 38-1813 or 38-1817. For purposes of this section, extraordinary circumstances may include circumstances in which a person who legally provides medical nutrition therapy in another state has not met the qualifications for licensure under section 38-1813 or 38-1817 within the five-year period after completion of the course of study.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 50.